Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2655.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 16, chapter 4, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 16-407.04, to read: START_STATUTE16-407.04. Election security standards and practices committee; membership; reviews; schedule The SECRETARY of state, in consultation and cooperation with county recorders, county election OFFICERS, city and town clerks and election officers and county boards of supervisors, shall ESTABLISH an election security standards and practices committee consisting of representatives from those elected officials, election administrators and TECHNICAL experts.  The committee shall: 1. Create and disseminate required and recommended election security controls to be implemented by election JURISDICTIONS, including controls for testing and verifying EQUIPMENT. 2. create and disseminate a self-assessment questionnaire that the JURISDICTIONS must use to confirm compliance with the standards. 3. ESTABLISH a process and schedule for regular review of and updates to security standards, practices and EQUIPMENT and for compliance review as follows: (a) On or before January 1 of each odd-numbered year, improve and update the standards, after opportunity for public comment. (b) On or before February 1 of each odd-numbered year, submit to the Secretary of State for publication and dissemination a self-assessment questionnaire that JURISDICTIONS must complete to confirm compliance with that year's standards. (c) On or before February 1 of each even-numbered year, require each jurisdiction to submit its completed self-assessment to the Secretary of State. END_STATUTE